Florida, session 2026, SB1048.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 12 14.36, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 14.36âReimagining Education and Career Help Act.âThe 14 Reimagining Education and Career Help Act is created to address 15 the evolving needs of Floridaâs economy by increasing the level 16 of collaboration and cooperation among state businesses and 17 education communities while improving training within and equity 18 and access to a more integrated workforce and education system 19 for all Floridians. 20 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 21 (a)ââCredentialâ means an apprenticeship certificate, 22 industry certification, license, advanced technical certificate, 23 college credit certificate, career certificate, leadership and 24 soft skills certificate offered by an accredited educational 25 organization or an entity that has been certified by a 26 recognized education and training entity, applied technology 27 diploma, associate in applied science degree, associate in 28 science degree, bachelors of applied science degree, and 29 bachelors of science degree. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.